Idaho, session 2025, H0280.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-1359, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-1359. USING PUBLIC POSITION FOR PERSONAL GAIN. (1) No public ser-
vant shall:
(a) Without the specific authorization of the governmental entity for
which he serves, use public funds or property to obtain a pecuniary ben-
efit for himself.
(b) Solicit, accept or receive a pecuniary benefit as payment for
services, advice, assistance or conduct customarily exercised in the
course of his official duties. This prohibition shall not include triv-
ial benefits not to exceed a value of fifty dollars ($50.00) incidental
to personal, professional or business contacts and involving no sub-
stantial risk of undermining official impartiality.
(c) Use or disclose confidential information gained in the course of or
by reason of his official position or activities in any manner with the
intent to obtain a pecuniary benefit for himself or any other person or
entity in whose welfare he is interested or with the intent to harm the
governmental entity for which he serves.
(d) Be interested in any contract made by him in his official capacity,
or by any body or board of which he is a member, except as provided in
section 18-1361, Idaho Code.
(e) Appoint or vote for the appointment of any person related to him by
blood or marriage within the second degree, to any clerkship, office,
position, employment or duty, when the salary, wages, pay or compen-
sation of such appointee is to be paid out of public funds or fees of
office, or appoint or furnish employment to any person whose salary,
wages, pay or compensation is to be paid out of public funds or fees of
office, and who is related by either blood or marriage within the second
degree to any other public servant when such appointment is made on the
agreement or promise of such other public servant or any other public
servant to appoint or furnish employment to anyone so related to the
public servant making or voting for such appointment. Any public ser-
vant who pays out of any public funds under his control or who draws or
authorizes the drawing of any warrant or authority for the payment out
of any public fund of the salary, wages, pay, or compensation of any such
ineligible person, knowing him to be ineligible, is guilty of a misde-
meanor and shall be punished as provided in this chapter.


(f) Unless specifically authorized by another provision of law, com-
mit any act prohibited of members of the legislature or any officer
or employee of any branch of the state government by section 67-9230,
Idaho Code, violations of which are subject to penalties as provided in
section 67-9231, Idaho Code, which prohibition and penalties shall be
deemed to extend to all public servants pursuant to the provisions of
this section.
(2) No person related to any member of the legislature by blood or mar-
riage within the second degree shall be appointed to any clerkship, office,
position, employment or duty within the legislative branch of government
or otherwise be employed by the legislative branch of government when the
salary, wages, pay or compensation of such appointee or employee is to be
paid out of public funds. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply
to any person who participates in the legislative page program of the senate
or the house of representatives.
(3) No person related to a mayor or member of a city council by blood or
marriage within the second degree shall be appointed to any clerkship, of-
fice, position, employment or duty with the mayor's or city council's city
when the salary, wages, pay or compensation of such appointee or employee is
to be paid out of public funds.
(4) No person related to a county commissioner by blood or marriage
within the second degree shall be appointed to any clerkship, office, po-
sition, employment or duty with the commissioner's county when the salary,
wages, pay or compensation of such appointee or employee is to be paid out of
public funds.
(5)(a) An employee of a governmental entity holding a position prior to
the election of a local government official, who is related within the
second degree, shall be entitled to retain his or her position and re-
ceive general pay increases, step increases, cost of living increases,
and/or other across-the-board increases in salary or merit increases,
benefits and bonuses or promotions.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed as creating any property
rights in the position held by an employee subject to this section, and
all authority in regard to disciplinary action, transfer, dismissal,
demotion or termination shall continue to apply to the employee.
(6) The prohibitions contained within this section shall not include
conduct defined by the provisions of section 74-403(4), Idaho Code.
(7) The prohibitions within this section and section 18-1356, Idaho
Code, as it applies to part-time public servants, do not include those ac-
tions or conduct involving the public servant's business, profession or
occupation and unrelated to the public servant's official conduct, and do
not apply to a pecuniary benefit received in the normal course of a leg-
islator's business, profession or occupation and unrelated to any bill,
legislation, proceeding or official transaction.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.